Hawaii, session 2026, HB123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that fisheries management in state waters is the responsibility of the department of land and natural resources.  In carrying out this responsibility, the department must conduct careful analysis of data on the fishery and its ecosystem to determine if the fishery can be sustainably harvested while ensuring the protection of the environmental and cultural values of the ecosystem of which it is a part.  For these reasons, the legislature finds that it is not necessary for the department or those engaged in operating or managing the fishery to also prepare documentation to comply with chapter 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to exempt actions involving the operation and management of all fisheries in the State from environmental review requirements under chapter 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 2.  Chapter 343, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§343-     Fisheries; exemption.  Actions involving the operation and management of all fisheries in the State shall be exempt from the requirements of this chapter." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________